nl: Kenmerken medische alarmsysteem: Automatische valdetectie; Noodoproepknop; Lange levensduur van de batterij; Connectiviteit over lange afstanden; Luid alarm; Integratie van mobiele apps; Draagbaar; Afstandsbediening; SOS-knop; Tweerichtingscommunicatie; Visuele waarschuwingen; Waterdicht; Andere
da: Medicinske alarmfunktioner: Automatisk falddetektering; Nødopkaldsknap; Lang batterilevetid; Lang rækkeviddetilslutning; Høj alarm; Mobilapp-integration; Transportabel; Fjernbetjening; SOS-knap; Tovejskommunikation; Visuelle advarsler; Vandtæt; Andet
fi: Lääketieteelliset hälytysominaisuudet: Automaattinen putoamisen tunnistus; Hätäpuhelupainike; Pitkä akunkesto; Pitkän kantaman yhteys; Kova hälytys; Mobiilisovellusten integrointi; Siirrettävät; Kauko-ohjain; SOS-painike; Kaksisuuntainen viestintä; Visuaaliset hälytykset; Vedenkestävä; Muu
zh-TW: 醫療警報功能: 自動跌倒偵測; 緊急呼叫按鈕; 電池壽命長; 可遠距連接; 大聲警報; 行動應用程式整合; 可攜式; 遠端控制; 求救按鈕; 雙向通訊; 視覺警報; 防水; 其他
fr: Fonctionnalités de l’alarme médicale: Détection automatique de chute; Bouton d’appel d’urgence; Batterie à longue durée de vie; Connectivité longue portée; Alarme forte; Application mobile intégrée; Portable; Télécommande; Touche SOS; Communication bidirectionnelle; Alertes visuelles; Imperméable; Autre
es: Características de la alarma médica: Detección automática de caídas; Botón de llamada de emergencia; Batería de larga duración; Conectividad de largo alcance; Alarma fuerte; Integración de aplicaciones móviles; Portátil; Control remoto; Botón de socorro; Comunicación bidireccional; Alertas visuales; Impermeable; Otros
pt-BR: Recursos do alarme hospitalar: Detecção automática de queda; Botão de chamada de emergência; Bateria de longa duração; Conectividade de longo alcance; Alarme alto; Integração de aplicativos móveis; Portátil; Controle remoto; Botão SOS; Comunicação bidirecional; Alertas visuais; À prova d'água; Outro
ko: 의료용 알람 기능: 자동 넘어짐 감지; 긴급 호출 버튼; 긴 배터리 수명; 장거리 연결; 시끄러운 경보; 모바일 앱 통합; 이동식; 원격 제어; SOS 버튼; 양방향 통신; 시각 알림; 방수; 기타
zh-CN: 医疗报警功能: 自动跌倒检测; 紧急呼叫按钮; 电池寿命长; 远距离连接; 超响警报; 移动应用集成; 便携式; 远程控制; 紧急按钮; 双向交流; 视觉警报; 防水; 其他
ru: Характеристики медицинской сигнализации: Автоматическое обнаружение падения; Кнопка экстренного вызова; Длительный срок службы батареи; Связь на большом расстоянии; Громкий сигнал тревоги; Интеграция с мобильным приложением; Портативный; Дистанционное управление; Кнопка SOS; Двусторонняя связь; Визуальные оповещения; Водонепроницаемый; Другое
el: Χαρακτηριστικά ιατρικού συναγερμού: Αυτόματη ανίχνευση πτώσης; Κουμπί κλήσης έκτακτης ανάγκης; Μεγάλη διάρκεια ζωής μπαταρίας; Συνδεσιμότητα μεγάλης εμβέλειας; Δυνατός συναγερμός; Ενσωμάτωση εφαρμογής για κινητά; Φορητό; Τηλεχειρισμός; Κουμπί SOS; Αμφίδρομη επικοινωνία; Οπτικές ειδοποιήσεις; Αδιάβροχο; Άλλο
it: Funzionalità di allarme medico: Rilevamento automatico delle cadute; Pulsante di chiamata di emergenza; Durata lunga della batteria; Connettività a lungo raggio; Allarme forte; Integrazione dell'app mobile; Portatile; Telecomando; Pulsante SOS; Comunicazione bidirezionale; Avvisi visivi; Impermeabile; Altro
bg-BG: Характеристики на медицинска аларма: Автоматично откриване на падане; Бутон за спешно повикване; Дълъг живот на батерията; Свързаност на дълги разстояния; Силна аларма; Интеграция на мобилни приложения; Преносима; Дистанционно управление; Бутон SOS; Двупосочна комуникация; Визуални сигнали; Водоустойчив; Други
en: Medical alarm features: Automatic fall detection; Emergency call button; Long battery life; Long range connectivity; Loud alarm; Mobile app integration; Portable; Remote control; SOS button; Two-way communication; Visual alerts; Waterproof; Other
cs: Vlastnosti lékařského alarmu: Automatická detekce pádu; Tlačítko nouzového volání; Dlouhá životnost baterie; Připojení s velkým dosahem; Hlasitý alarm; Integrace mobilní aplikace; Přenosné; Dálkové ovládání; SOS tlačítko; Obousměrná komunikace; Vizuální upozornění; Voděodolný; Jiné
vi: Tính năng cảnh báo y tế: Tự động phát hiện rơi; Nút gọi khẩn cấp; Thời lượng pin lâu; Kết nối tầm xa; Báo động lớn; Tích hợp ứng dụng di động; Xách tay; Điều khiển từ xa; Nút SOS; Giao tiếp hai chiều; Cảnh báo trực quan; Chống thấm nước; Khác
pt-PT: Características de alarme médico: Deteção de queda automática; Botão de chamada de emergência; Bateria de longa duração; Conectividade de longo alcance; Alarme alto; Integração de aplicação móvel; Portáteis; Controlo remoto; Botão SOS; Comunicação bidirecional; Alertas visuais; Impermeável; Outro
tr: Medikal Alarm özellikleri: Otomatik düşme algılama; Acil çağrı butonu; Uzun pil ömrü; Uzun menzilli bağlantı; Yüksek alarm; Mobil uygulama entegrasyonu; Taşınabilir; Uzaktan kumanda; Acil durum düğmesi; İki yönlü iletişim; Görsel uyarılar; Su geçirmez; Diğer
pl: Charakterystyka alarmu medycznego: Automatyczne wykrywanie upadku; Przycisk połączenia alarmowego; Długi czas pracy na baterii; Łączność dalekiego zasięgu; Głośny alarm; Integracja aplikacji mobilnych; Przenośny; Zdalne sterowanie; Przycisk SOS; Dwukierunkowa komunikacja; Alerty wizualne; Wodoszczelny; Inne
lt-LT: Medicininės signalizacijos funkcijos: Automatinis kritimo aptikimas; Pagalbos iškvietimo mygtukas; Ilgas akumuliatoriaus veikimo laikas; Ilgo nuotolio ryšys; Garsus signalas; Sąsaja su mobiliąja programėle; Nešiojamas; Nuotolinis valdymas; SOS mygtukas; Abipusis ryšys; Vaizdiniai įspėjimai; Atsparus vandeniui; Kita
de: Medizinische Alarmfunktionen: Automatische Sturzerkennung; Notruftaste; Lange Batterielebensdauer; Konnektivität über große Entfernungen; Lauter Alarm; Integration mobiler Apps; Tragbar; Fernsteuerung; SOS-Knopf; Zwei-Wege-Kommunikation; Visuelle Warnungen; Wasserdicht; Sonstiges
hr-HR: Značajke medicinskog alarma: Automatska detekcija pada; Gumb za hitni poziv; Dugotrajna baterija; Povezivost velikog dometa; Glasan alarm; Integracija s mobilnom aplikacijom; Prijenosno; Upravljanje na daljinu; Gumb za SOS; Dvosmjerna komunikacija; Vizualna upozorenja; Vodootporno; Ostalo
sk-SK: Funkcie lekárskeho alarmu: Automatická detekcia pádu; Tlačidlo núdzového volania; Dlhá výdrž batérie; Pripojenie na veľké vzdialenosti; Hlasný alarm; Integrácia mobilnej aplikácie; Prenosný; Diaľkové ovládanie; SOS tlačidlo; Obojsmerná komunikácia; Vizuálne upozornenia; Vodotesný; Iné
th: คุณลักษณะของระบบสัญญาณเตือนทางการแพทย์: การตรวจจับการล้มอัตโนมัติ; ปุ่มโทรฉุกเฉิน; อายุการใช้งานแบตเตอรี่ยาวนาน; การเชื่อมต่อระยะไกล; สัญญาณเตือนดัง; การผสานการทำงานแอปมือถือ; แบบพกพา; รีโมตควบคุม; ปุ่ม SOS; การสื่อสารสองทาง; การแจ้งเตือนด้วยภาพ; กันน้ำ; อื่นๆ
sv: Detaljer för medicinska larm: Automatisk falldetektering; Nödsamtalsknapp; Lång batteritid; Långdistansanslutning; Högt larm; Mobilappintegration; Bärbar; Fjärrkontroll; SOS-knapp; Tvåvägskommunikation; Visuella aviseringar; Vattensäker; Övrigt
hu: Egészségügyi riasztórendszer jellemzői: Automatikus esésérzékelés; Segélyhívás gomb; Hosszú akkumulátor-élettartam; Nagy hatótávolságú csatlakozás; Hangos riasztás; Mobilalkalmazás-integráció; Hordozható; Távvezérlés; SOS gomb; Kétirányú kommunikáció; Vizuális riasztások; Vízálló; Egyéb
nb: Medisinske alarmfunksjoner: Automatisk falldeteksjon; Nødanropsknapp; Lang batteritid; Tilkobling med lang rekkevidde; Høy alarm; Mobilapp-integrasjon; Bærbar; Fjernkontroll; SOS-knapp; Toveis kommunikasjon; Visuelle varsler; Vannsikker; Annet
sl-SI: Funkcije medicinskega alarma: Samodejno zaznavanje padca; Gumb za klic v sili; Dolga življenjska doba baterije; Povezljivost na velike razdalje; Glasen alarm; Integracija mobilne aplikacije; Prenosno; Daljinsko upravljanje; SOS gumb; Dvosmerna komunikacija; Vizualna opozorila; Vodoodporna; Drugo
ja: 医療アラーム機能: 自動落下検知; 緊急通報ボタン; 長いバッテリー寿命; 長距離接続; 大音量アラーム; モバイルアプリ統合; ポータブル; リモコン; SOSボタン; 双方向通信; 視覚的アラート; 防水; その他
ro-RO: Caracteristici alarmă medicală: Detectare automată a căderii; Buton de apel de urgență; Autonomie mare a bateriei; Conectivitate cu rază largă de acțiune; Alarmă puternică; Integrare aplicații mobile; Portabilă; Telecomandă; Buton SOS; Comunicare bidirecțională; Alerte vizuale; Impermeabilă; Altele